Utah statutes.
7-17-5.   Statements.

Every lender shall furnish to the borrower, or his successors or assigns, without charge, within 60 days after the end of each calendar year, an itemized statement showing money (1) received for interest and principal repayment and (2) received and held in or disbursed from a reserve account, if any.



Enacted by Chapter 124, 1979 General Session

